Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.021

Real estate commission created—Qualifications, terms, appointment of members—Vacancies.

There is established the real estate commission of the state of Washington, consisting of the director who is the chair of the commission and six commission members who shall act in an advisory capacity to the director. The commission shall annually elect a vice chair to conduct the commission meetings in the absence of the director.

The governor must appoint six commission members for a term of six years each. At least two of the commission members shall be selected from the area in the state west of the Cascade mountain range and at least two shall be selected from that area of the state east of the Cascade mountain range. No commission member shall be appointed who has had less than five years' experience in performing real estate brokerage services in this state, or has had at least three years' experience in investigative work of a similar nature, preferably in connection with the administration of real estate license law of this state or elsewhere. The governor must fill by appointment any vacancies on the commission for the unexpired term.

[ 2008 c 23 s 7; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 6; 1953 c 235 s 17. Formerly RCW 18.85.071.]